Oklahoma, session 2026, HB2965.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 7-324, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 7-324. (a) Certification. A "motor vehicle liability
policy" as the term is used in this article shall mean an "owner's
policy" or an "operator's policy" of liability insurance, certified
as provided in Section 7-321 or Section 7-322 of this title as proof
of financial responsibility, and issued, except as otherwise
provided in Section 7-322 of this title, by an insurance carrier
duly authorized to transact business in this state, to or for the
benefit of the person named therein as insured.
(b) Owner's policy. Such owner's policy of liability
insurance:
Req. No. 13953 Page 1

1. Shall designate by explicit description or by appropriate
reference all vehicles with respect to which coverage is thereby to
be granted; and
2. Shall insure the person named therein and any other person
except as herein provided, as insured, using any such vehicle or
vehicles with the express or implied permission of such named
insured, against loss from the liability imposed by law for damages
arising out of the ownership, maintenance or use of such vehicle or
vehicles within the United States of America or the Dominion of
Canada, subject to limits exclusive of interest and costs, with
respect to each such vehicle, as follows: Twenty-five Thousand
Dollars ($25,000.00) Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00) because of
bodily injury to or death of one person in any one accident and,
subject to said limit for one person, Fifty Thousand Dollars
($50,000.00) because of bodily injury to or death of two or more
persons in any one accident, and Twenty-five Thousand Dollars
($25,000.00) Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00) because of injury
to or destruction of property of others in any one accident.
3. May by agreement in a separate written endorsement between
any named insured and the insurer exclude as insured any person or
persons designated by name from coverage under the policy.
(c) Operator's policy. Such operator's policy of liability
insurance shall insure the person named as insured therein against
loss from the liability imposed upon him the person by law for
Req. No. 13953 Page 2

dama ges arising out of the use by him the person of any motor
vehicle not owned by him the person, within the same territorial
limits and subject to the same limits of liability as are set forth
above with respect to an owner's policy of liability insurance.
(d) Required statements in policies. Such motor vehicle
liability policy shall state the name and address of the named
insured, the coverage afforded by the policy, the premium charged
therefor, the policy period and the limits of liability, and shall
contain an agreement or be endorsed that insurance is provided
thereunder in accordance with the coverage defined in this chapter
as respects bodily injury and death or property damage, or both, and
is subject to all the provisions of this title.
(e) Policy need not insure workmen's workers' compensation.
Such motor vehicle liability policy need not insure any liability
under any workmen's workers' compensation law nor any liability on
account of bodily injury to or death of an employee of the insured
while engaged in the employment, other than domestic, of the
insured, or while engaged in the operation, maintenance or repair of
any such vehicle nor any liability for damage to property owned by,
rented to, in charge of or transported by the insured.
(f) Provisions incorporated in policy. Every motor vehicle
liability policy shall be subject to the following provisions which
need not be contained therein:

Req. No. 13953 Page 3

1. The liability of the insurance carrier with respect to the
insurance required by this title shall become absolute whenever
injury or damage covered by said motor vehicle liability policy
occurs; said policy may not be canceled or annulled as to such
liability by any agreement between the insurance carrier and the
insured after the occurrence of the injury or damage; no statement
made by the insured or on his the insured's behalf and no violation
of said policy shall defeat or void said policy.
2. The satisfaction by the insured of a judgment for such
injury or damage shall not be a condition precedent to the right or
duty of the insurance carrier to make payment on account of such
injury or damage.
3. The insurance carrier shall have the right to settle any
claim covered by the policy, and if such settlement is made in good
faith, the amount thereof shall be deductible from the limits of
liability specified in paragraph 2 of subsection (b) of this
section.
4. The policy, the written application therefor, if any, and
any rider or endorsement which does not conflict with the provisions
of this title shall constitute the entire contract between the
parties.
(g) Excess or additional coverage. Any policy which grants the
coverage required for a motor vehicle liability policy may also
grant any lawful coverage in excess of or in addition to the
Req. No. 13953 Page 4

cove rage specified for a motor vehicle liability policy and such
excess or additional coverage shall not be subject to the provisions
of this title. With respect to a policy which grants such excess or
additional coverage, the term "motor vehicle liability policy" shall
apply only to that part of the coverage which is required by this
section.
(h) Reimbursement provision permitted. Any motor vehicle
liability policy may provide that the insured shall reimburse the
insurance carrier for any payment the insurance carrier would not
have been obligated to make under the terms of the policy except for
the provisions of this title.
(i) Proration of insurance permitted. Any motor vehicle
liability policy may provide for the prorating of the insurance
thereunder with other valid and collectible insurance.
(j) Multiple policies. The requirements for a motor vehicle
liability policy may be fulfilled by the policies of one or more
insurance carriers which policies together meet such requirements.
(k) Binders. Any binder issued pending the issuance of a motor
vehicle liability policy shall be deemed to fulfill the requirements
for such a policy.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

60-2-13953 MJ 10/24/25

Req. No. 13953 Page 5